Hawaii statutes.
[§37-68.5] Position ceiling. Whenever
this part requires a position ceiling to be specified:

(1) The number of permanent positions and temporary
positions shall be separately identified; and

(2) The position ceiling shall be expressed in units
or fractions of full-time equivalent positions. [L 2015, c 160, §2]

Note

Applicability of section. L 2015, c 160, §11.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next